test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kavnattattad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kavnâdâttâđ: 
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Inf: kavnâdâttâđ
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavnâdâđâm
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kavnâdâđah
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavnâdât
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: [kavnâdâtteen, kavnâdetteen]
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kavnâdâtvettee
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kavnâdâttâv
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kavnâdâttâp
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kavnâdâtvetteđ
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [kavnâdâtteh, kavnâdetteh]
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [kavnâdâttim, kavnâdettim]
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kavnâdâttih, kavnâdettih]
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kavnâdâđâi
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kavnâdâđáim
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kavnâdâđáid
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kavnâdâđáin
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kavnâdâđâim
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kavnâdâđâid
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kavnâdâttii, kavnâdettii]
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kavnâdâđâččim
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kavnâdâđâččih
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kavnâdâđâččij
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kavnâdâđâččáim
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kavnâdâđâččáid
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kavnâdâđâččáin
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kavnâdâđâččijm
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kavnâdâđâččijd
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kavnâdâđâččii
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kavnâdât
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kavnâdâđos
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kavnâdâttoon
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kavnâdâttee
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kavnâdâttos
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kavnâdâttop
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kavnâdâttâđ
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kavnâdâttos
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kavnâdât
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kavnâdâttâm
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kavnâdâđâččii
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+PrsPrc: kavnâdâttee
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+PrfPrc: kavnâdâttâm
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Actio+Nom: kavnâdâttâm
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kavnâdâtmin
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kavnâdâtmist
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kavnâdâtmân
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+Actio+Com: kavnâdâtmáin
    kavnâdâttâđ+V+VAbess: kavnâdâthánnáá


  Verb - hárávuššâđ:
    hárávuššâđ+V+Inf: hárávuššâđ
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárávušâm
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hárávušah
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hárávuš
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: hárávuššeen
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: hárávušvettee
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: hárávuššâv
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hárávuššâp
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hárávušvetteđ
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hárávuššeh
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hárávuššim
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hárávušših
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hárávušâi
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: hárávušáim
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: hárávušáid
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: hárávušáin
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hárávušâim
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hárávušâid
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hárávuššii
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: hárávuš
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hárávuššim
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hárávušâi
    hárávuššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hárávuššii
    hárávuššâđ+V+PrfPrc: hárávuššâm
    hárávuššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: hárávuššum
    hárávuššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: hárávuššum
